Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.901

Hazing prohibited—Penalty.

(1) No student, or other person in attendance at any public or private institution of higher education, or any other postsecondary educational institution, may intentionally haze another.

(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, a violation of subsection (1) of this section is a gross misdemeanor, punishable as provided under RCW 9A.20.021.

(b) A violation of subsection (1) of this section that causes substantial bodily harm, as defined in RCW 9A.04.110, to another person is a class C felony.

(3) Any student organization, association, or student living group that permits hazing is strictly liable for damages caused to persons or property resulting from hazing. If the student organization, association, or student living group is a corporation whether for profit or nonprofit, the individual directors of the corporation may be held individually liable for damages.

[ 2023 c 196 s 1; 1993 c 514 s 2.]

NOTES:

Short title—2023 c 196: "This act may be known and cited as the Sam Martinez stop hazing law." [ 2023 c 196 s 5.]